Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 6. Early or Absentee Voters
§ 2546a.
Deposit of early voter absentee ballots in vote tabulator.

Generally. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the board of civil authority may vote to permit elections officials to deposit early voter absentee ballots that have been processed in accordance with subsection 2546(a) of this subchapter and have not been deemed defective into the vote tabulator or ballot box in accordance with the provisions of this section and any guidance issued by the Secretary of State. Any such depositing of ballots shall take place at the town clerk’s office during the 30 days preceding the election.

Notice. If a board of civil authority votes to deposit ballots as described in subsection (a) of this section, the process shall be conducted during normal business hours if practicable or, if conducting the process at a time other than normal business hours, notice of the date(s), time(s), and location of the processing shall be posted at the clerk’s office and two other public places at least three days in advance.

Officials. The town clerk and at least two other election officials, from different political parties to the extent practicable, shall be present for the inspection of the sealed certificate envelopes and the processing of the ballots described in this section.

Processing. The Secretary of State’s office shall issue detailed procedures for conducting the processing of early ballots into the vote tabulator or ballot box pursuant to this section. A town or city shall follow the procedures issued by the Secretary of State’s office for this purpose.

Rules. The Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 7a, eff. Jan. 1, 2017; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 33;

2021, No. 60

, § 14, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 2546b.
Early voting in town clerk’s office; deposit into vote tabulator.

A board of civil authority may vote to permit its town’s registered early or absentee voters to vote in the town clerk’s office in the same manner as those voting on election day by marking their early voter absentee ballots and depositing them into a vote tabulator or secure ballot box.
(a) (1) A board of civil authority may vote to permit its town’s registered early or absentee voters to vote in the town clerk’s office in the same manner as those voting on election day by marking their early voter absentee ballots and depositing them into a vote tabulator or secure ballot box.

If a board of civil authority votes to permit early voting as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, the town’s process for conducting this early voting shall conform to the provisions of this section and to procedures that the Secretary of State shall adopt for this purpose.

During business hours in the town clerk’s office, the secure ballot box or vote tabulator and ballot bin shall be in a secured area accessible only to election officials and voters. The vote tabulator unit shall be secured with an identifiable seal and the ballot box containing voted ballots shall remain locked at all times and secured with an identifiable seal. Neither seal shall be broken prior to the time of closing the polls on election day.
(b) (1) During business hours in the town clerk’s office, the secure ballot box or vote tabulator and ballot bin shall be in a secured area accessible only to election officials and voters. The vote tabulator unit shall be secured with an identifiable seal and the ballot box containing voted ballots shall remain locked at all times and secured with an identifiable seal. Neither seal shall be broken prior to the time of closing the polls on election day.

Once early voting has commenced in the town clerk’s office, the town clerk or designee shall certify each day in a record prepared for this purpose that the seals on the vote tabulator and secure ballot box are intact.

When an election official is not present or at times other than business hours, the secure ballot box or sealed vote tabulator and ballot bin shall be secured in the town clerk’s office vault.

The town clerk shall maintain a record of each early or absentee voter who voted in person in accordance with this section and shall mark these voters as having voted early in the clerk’s office in the online election management system.

On the day of the election:

The secure ballot box or sealed vote tabulator and ballot bin shall be transferred to the polling place on election day by two election officials and shall not be opened until the polls have closed on election day.

When the vote tabulator is turned on at the polling place, the town clerk shall verify that the number of ballots that the vote tabulator displays as having been counted matches the number of voters who deposited their early voter absentee ballots in the vote tabulator in accordance with this section and any early voter absentee ballots that were processed and deposited in the vote tabulator under section 2546a of this subchapter.

All early voter absentee ballots shall be commingled with those voted at the polls on election day prior to being examined for the purpose of identifying write-in votes.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 67

, § 14, eff. July 1, 2020; amended

2021, No. 60

, § 15, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 2547.
Defective ballots.

If upon examination by the election officials it shall appear that any of the following defects is present, either the ballot or the unopened certificate envelope shall be marked “defective” and the ballot shall not be counted:

the identity of the early or absentee voter cannot be determined;

the early or absentee voter is not legally qualified to vote;

the early or absentee voter has voted in person or previously returned a ballot in the same election;

the certificate is not signed;

the voted ballot is not in the certificate envelope; or

in the case of a primary vote, the early or absentee voter has failed to return the unvoted primary ballots.

Each defective ballot or unopened certificate envelope shall be:

affixed with a note from the presiding officer indicating the reason it was determined to be defective; and

placed with other such defective ballots in an envelope marked “Defective Ballots — Voter Checked Off Checklist — Do Not Count”.

The provisions of this section shall be indicated prominently in the early or absentee voter material prepared by the Secretary of State.

If a ballot is deemed defective, the voter shall be notified of the defect in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 2546(a)(2)(B) of this subchapter. Upon notification, the voter may cure the defect until the closing of the polls on election day by:
(d) (1) If a ballot is deemed defective, the voter shall be notified of the defect in accordance with the provisions of subdivision 2546(a)(2)(B) of this subchapter. Upon notification, the voter may cure the defect until the closing of the polls on election day by:

correcting the defect or submitting a new absentee ballot in person at the clerk’s office or at the polling place on election day;

requesting a new ballot be mailed to them by the clerk along with materials for submission of the new ballot, provided the new ballot is received by the presiding officer or other sworn election official prior to the closing of the polls; or

for a voter who failed to sign the certificate envelope, failed to place the voted ballot in the certificate envelope, or did not return their unvoted primary ballots in the unvoted ballot envelope, returning the signed affidavit included in the notice under subdivision 2546(a)(2)(B)(iii) of this subchapter either by mail, in person, or electronically, provided the affidavit is received by the presiding officer or other sworn election official prior to the closing of the polls if returned in person or by mail or prior to the close of business on the day before the election if returned electronically.

If a voter corrects the defect in accordance with subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(C) of this subsection (d), the clerk shall update the status of the ballot to “received — accepted” in the online election management system.
(2) (A) If a voter corrects the defect in accordance with subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(C) of this subsection (d), the clerk shall update the status of the ballot to “received — accepted” in the online election management system.

If a voter corrects the defect by requesting a new ballot be mailed to them under subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection (d), the clerk shall enter a second absentee ballot request and issue date for that voter in the online election management system.

The same voter may cure a ballot deemed defective not more than twice for any single election.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2001, No. 6

, § 11, eff. April 10, 2001;

2015, No. 30

, § 14, eff. May 26, 2015;

2017, No. 50

, § 34;

2019, No. 67

, § 14;

2021, No. 60

, § 16, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 2548.
Voting in person.

Prior to the opening of the polls, the municipal clerk shall provide the election officials of each polling place with a list of the names of all persons who have voted early in the clerk’s office or marked and returned early voter absentee ballots, and these persons shall not thereafter vote in person in the same election.

A voter who has been issued an early ballot, either by the Secretary of State’s office pursuant to section 2537a of this subchapter or otherwise by the town clerk, but who has not returned the voter’s voted ballot to the clerk, may vote in person at the polling place on election day.
(b) (1) A voter who has been issued an early ballot, either by the Secretary of State’s office pursuant to section 2537a of this subchapter or otherwise by the town clerk, but who has not returned the voter’s voted ballot to the clerk, may vote in person at the polling place on election day.

If the voter brings the voter’s marked ballot enclosed in the signed certificate envelope, the voter may submit that certificate envelope containing the voted ballot to the entrance checklist official for processing along with any other early or absentee ballots. The voter shall be marked off the checklist and the clerk shall record the voter as having returned the absentee ballot on election day in the online election management system.

If the voter brings the marked ballot, but it is not enclosed in the certificate envelope, the voter shall be marked off the checklist and be allowed to cast that ballot into the secure ballot box or tabulator in the same manner as other voters who are voting in the polling place. The clerk shall record any such voter as having voted in person on election day in the online election management system.

If the voter brings the unmarked ballot, the voter shall be marked off the checklist and allowed to proceed to a voting booth to mark that ballot and cast it into the ballot box or tabulator in the same manner as other voters who are voting in the polling place. The presiding officer may choose to provide any such voter with a new ballot in exchange for the unvoted ballot that the voter brought to the polls. The clerk shall record any such voter as having voted in person on election day in the online election management system.

If the voter does not bring a marked or an unmarked ballot with them to the polls, the voter shall be required to sign an affidavit that the voter has not previously cast a ballot in the election and only then shall they be checked off the checklist and allowed to vote in the same manner as all other voters who are voting at the polling place. The clerk shall record any such voter as having voted in person on election day in the online election management system. Any affidavits signed by voters at the polling place pursuant to this section shall be retained for a period of 90 days following the election.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 6

, § 12(a), (b), eff. April 10, 2001;

2007, No. 54

, § 8c;

2017, No. 50

, § 35;

2021, No. 60

, § 17, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 2549.
Use of federal war ballot.

In addition to and supplementing the provisions of this title, the provisions of any federal statute for a federal war ballot and for procedures affecting and facilitating voting by members of the military service of the United States are hereby authorized for use in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2550.
Early or absentee voters deemed “present and voting”.

A voter voting by early voter absentee ballot shall be deemed as “present and voting,” for purposes of any provision in which the phrase “present and voting” is used in the Vermont Statutes Annotated or in the acts of the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 6

, § 12(a), (b), eff. April 10, 2001.